South Dakota, session 2026, HB1087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 2-1-1.1 be AMENDED:
2-1-1.1. A petition sponsor shall file, in a physical and electronic copy format, a
petition for an initiated amendment to the South Dakota Constitution, as it is to be
circulated, with the secretary of state before the petition may be circulated and at least
one year before the next general election at which the initiated amendment to the
constitution is proposed to be submitted to the voters. The petition must:
(1) Be accompanied by the full text of the initiated amendment in fourteen-point font;
(2) Designate, in fourteen-point font, the date of the general election at which the
initiated amendment is to be submitted;
(3) Contain, in fourteen-point font, the title and explanation of the initiated
amendment as prepared by the attorney general, pursuant to § 12-13-25.1;
(4) Contain the fiscal note, if any, prepared pursuant to § 2-9-30, in fourteen-point
font;
(5) Be accompanied by a notarized affidavit form, signed by each person who is a
petition sponsor, which includes the name and address of each petition sponsor;
and
(6) Be accompanied by a statement of organization as provided in § 12-27-6.
The title to be contained on a petition for an initiated amendment, pursuant to
subdivision (3), must be included on both sides of the sheet of paper on which the petition
is printed. The title printed on the back side of the petition must be printed in at least
sixteen-point font.
Only an individual who is registered as a voter of this state, pursuant to chapter
12-4, may be a petition sponsor for an initiated amendment to the constitution.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.631.18 2 1087
Each petition circulator shall provide to each individual who signs the petition a
circulator handout containing the title of the initiated amendment to the Constitution, as
prepared by the attorney general; the full text of the initiated amendment to the
Constitution; the name, phone number, and email address of each petition sponsor; and
a statement indicating whether the petition circulator is a volunteer or a paid circulator
and, if a paid circulator, the amount the circulator is being paid that the circulator is not
being compensated for circulating the petition. The secretary of state must approve the
circulator handout for each initiated amendment to the Constitution before the petition is
circulated.
A petition for an initiated amendment to the constitution may not be circulated
more than twenty-four months before the general election that was designated pursuant
to subdivision (2). A sworn affidavit, signed by at least two-thirds of the petition sponsors,
stating that the documents filed constitute the entire petition and to the best of the
knowledge of the sponsors contains a sufficient number of signatures, must also be filed
with the secretary of state. The initiated amendment petition signatures must be filed with
the secretary of state by the first Tuesday in February of a general election year for the
initiated amendment to qualify for submission to the voters at the next general election.
The State Board of Elections shall prescribe the form of the petition, including
petition size and petition font size for ballot measure language not prescribed in this
section.
Section 2. That § 2-1-1.2 be AMENDED:
2-1-1.2. A petition sponsor shall file, in physical and electronic copy format, a
petition for an initiated measure, as it is to be circulated, with the secretary of state,
before the petition may be circulated and at least one year before the next general election
at which the initiated measure is proposed to be submitted to the voters. The petition
must:
(1) Be accompanied by the full text of the initiated measure in fourteen-point font;
(2) Designate, in fourteen-point font, the date of the general election at which the
initiated measure is to be submitted;
(3) Contain, in fourteen-point font, the title and explanation of the initiated measure
as prepared by the attorney general, pursuant to § 12-13-25.1;
(4) Contain the fiscal note, if any, prepared pursuant to § 2-9-30, in fourteen-point
font;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.631.18 3 1087
(5) Be accompanied by a notarized affidavit form signed by each person who is a
petition sponsor, which includes the name and address of each petition sponsor;
and
(6) Be accompanied by a statement of organization as provided in § 12-27-6.
The title to be contained on a petition for an initiated amendment, pursuant to
subdivision (3), must be included on both sides of the sheet of paper on which the petition
is printed. The title printed on the back side of the petition must be printed in at least
sixteen-point font.
Only an individual who is registered as a voter of this state, pursuant to chapter
12-4, may be a petition sponsor for an initiated measure.
Each petition circulator shall provide to each individual who signs the petition a
circulator handout containing the title of the initiated measure as prepared by the attorney
general; the full text of the initiated measure; the name, phone number, and email
address of each petition sponsor; and a statement indicating whether the petition
circulator is a volunteer or a paid circulator and, if a paid circulator, the amount the
circulator is being paid that the circulator is not being compensated for circulating the
petition. The secretary of state must approve the circulator handout for each initiated
measure before the petition is circulated.
A petition for an initiated measure may not be circulated more than twenty-four
months before the general election that was designated pursuant to subdivision (2). A
sworn affidavit, signed by at least two-thirds of the petition sponsors, stating that the
documents filed constitute the entire petition and to the best of the knowledge of the
sponsors contains a sufficient number of signatures, must also be filed with the secretary
of state. The initiated measure petition signatures must be filed with the secretary of state
by the first Tuesday in February of a general election year for the initiated measure to
qualify for submission to the voters at the next general election.
The State Board of Elections shall prescribe the form of the petition, including
petition size and petition font size for ballot measure language not prescribed in this
section.
Section 3. That § 2-1-1.3 be AMENDED:
2-1-1.3. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Circulates," either:
(a) Physically presents or otherwise makes available a ballot measure petition
to another person for that person's signature; or
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.631.18 4 1087
(b) Solicits from another person, personally and in the presence of such other
person, a signature on a ballot measure petition, while acting in concert
with another person who simultaneously physically presents or otherwise
makes available the ballot measure petition;
(2) "Petition circulator," the same as the term is defined under § 12-1-3;
(3) "Petition sponsor," any person who proposes the placement of a statewide ballot
measure on the ballot;
(4) "Ballot measure," any measure placed on a statewide ballot in accordance with
§ 2-1-1.1, 2-1-1.2, or 2-1-3.1;
(5) "Paid circulator," any person who receives money or anything of value as
consideration, in whole or in part, for acting as a petition circulator;
(6) "Volunteer circulator," any person who does not receive money or anything of value
as consideration, in whole or in part, for acting as a petition circulator
(1) "Ballot measure," an initiated amendment to the Constitution, initiated measure,
or referred law that is submitted to a vote of the people and placed on a statewide
ballot;
(2) "Circulate," the act by which a petition circulator solicits a signature from another
individual by physically presenting or otherwise making available a ballot measure
petition to the other individual;
(3) "Compensate," a gift, advance, distribution, deposit, payment of money or other
thing of value provided as consideration or as an inducement for circulating a
petition, regardless of whether the gift, advance, distribution, deposit, payment is
provided prior to circulating the petition, during the time when the petition is being
circulated, or deferred until after the circulation process is concluded, provided that
the term does not include the reimbursement of any money expended on legitimate
expenses incurred in the act of circulating a petition;
(4) "Petition circulator," an individual who:
(a) Is a resident of this state, as defined in § 12-1-4;
(b) Is at least eighteen years of age; and
(c) Solicits a signature from another individual by physically presenting or
otherwise making available a ballot measure petition to the other individual;
and
(5) "Petition sponsor," any person who proposes the placement of a statewide ballot
measure on the ballot.
Section 4. That § 2-1-3.1 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.631.18 5 1087
2-1-3.1. A petition sponsor shall file, in physical and electronic format, a petition
to refer a law, as it is to be circulated, with the secretary of state before the petition may
be circulated. The petition must:
(1) Contain, in fourteen-point font, the title of the referred law;
(2) Contain the effective date of the referred law in fourteen-point font;
(3) Contain the date of the general election at which the referred law is to be submitted
in fourteen-point font;
(4) Be accompanied by a notarized form signed by each person who is a petition
sponsor, which includes the names and addresses of each petition sponsor; and
(5) Be accompanied by a statement of organization as provided in § 12-27-6.
The title required to be contained on a petition to refer a law, pursuant to
subdivision (1), must be included on both sides of the sheet of paper on which the petition
is printed. The title printed on the back side of the petition must be printed in at least
sixteen-point font.
Only an individual who is registered as a voter of this state, pursuant to chapter
12-4, may be a petition sponsor for a petition to refer a law.
The petition circulator shall provide to each person who signs the petition a
circulator handout containing the title of the referred law; the name, phone number, and
email address of each petition sponsor; a statement whether the petition circulator is a
volunteer or paid circulator and, if a paid circulator, the amount the circulator is being
paid indicating that the circulator is not being compensated for circulating the petition.
The secretary of state must approve the circulator handout for each referred law before
the petition is circulated.
The signatures on a petition to refer a law must be filed with the secretary of state
within ninety days after the Legislature that passed the referred law adjourned sine die.
A sworn affidavit, stating that the documents filed constitute the entire petition and, to
the best knowledge of the sponsors, contain at least the number of valid signatures
required by S.D. Const., Art. III § 1, must be signed by at least two-thirds of the petition
sponsors and filed with the secretary of state, along with the petition signatures.
The State Board of Elections shall prescribe the form of the petition and affidavit.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 2-1:
No person may compensate any other person as consideration or as an inducement
for circulating a petition to initiate a measure or an amendment to the constitution, or to
refer a law to a vote of the electors of this state.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.631.18 6 1087
Upon a judicial finding of any violation of this section, the petition must be deemed
void ab initio.
Section 6. That § 12-1-3 be AMENDED:
12-1-3. Terms used in this title mean:
(1) "Ballot question committee," as defined by § 12-27-1;
(2) "Candidate," a person whose name is on the ballot or who is entitled to be on the
ballot to be voted upon for nomination or election at any election;
(3) "Election," any election held under the laws of this state;
(4) "Election officials," state and local officials charged with the duty of conducting
elections and the canvass of returns;
(5) "Elector," a person qualified to register as a voter, whether or not the person is
registered;
(6) "Electronic pollbook," an electronic system containing both the registration list and
pollbook;
(7) "General election," the vote required to be taken in each voting precinct of the
state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-
numbered year;
(8) "Paid circulator," any person who receives money or anything of value for collecting
signatures for a petition;
(9) "Party office," an office of a political party organization as distinct from a public
office;
(10)(9) "Person in charge of an election," or "person charged with the conduct of an
election," the county auditor in all cases except local elections for a municipality,
school district, township, or other political subdivision, in which case it is the officer
having the position comparable to the auditor in that unit of government if not
specifically designated by law;
(11)(10) "Petition," a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections, which contains
the question or candidacy being petitioned, the declaration of candidacy if required
and the verification of the circulator. If multiple sheets of paper are necessary to
obtain the required number of signatures, each sheet shall be self-contained and
separately verified by the circulator;
(12)(11) "Petition circulator," a resident of the State of South Dakota as defined under
§ 12-1-4, who is at least eighteen years of age who circulates nominating petitions
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.631.18 7 1087
or other petitions for the purpose of placing candidates or issues on any election
ballot;
(13)(12) "Political party," beginning with the 2014 general election and each general
election thereafter, a party whose candidate for any statewide office received at
least two and one-half percent of the total votes cast for that statewide office in
either of the two previous general election cycles;
(14)(13) "Pollbook" or "poll list," a list containing in numerical order the names of all
persons voting at the election and type of ballot voted;
(15)(14) "Polling place," a designated place voters may go to vote;
(16)(15) "Poll watcher," a person chosen to observe the conduct of an election by a
candidate, political party, or ballot question committee;
(17)(16) "Primary" or "primary election," an election held at which candidates are
nominated for public office;
(18)(17) "Public office," an elected position in government;
(19)(18) "Registration list," a list of eligible voters;
(20)(19) "Registered mail," does not include certified mail;
(21)(20) "Registration officials," the county auditor and deputies and other persons
authorized to assist in registration pursuant to chapter 12-4;
(22)(21) "Vote center," a polling place when the precinct has been defined as the entire
jurisdiction and an electronic pollbook is utilized;
(23)(22) "Voter," a person duly registered to vote or one who is performing the act of
voting;
(24)(23) "Independent (IND)" or "no party affiliation (NPA)," any currently registered
voter who writes independent, I, Ind, no party affiliation, no party, no choice,
nonpartisan, or line crossed off in the choice of party field on the voter registration
form and any individual who is not currently registered to vote who leaves the
choice of party field blank on the voter registration form;
(25) "Independent candidate," notwithstanding the definition of independent as stated
in this chapter, any registered voter regardless of party affiliation who declares to
be an independent candidate for public office pursuant to this chapter; and
(26) "Other," any voter who writes a political party not recognized in South Dakota in
the choice of party field on the voter registration form.
Section 7. That § 49-35-9 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.631.18 8 1087
49-35-9. Every sheet of every petition for the organization of a consumers power
district containing signatures shall have upon it and below the signatures a circulator's
verification as required by subdivision 12-1-3(8) 12-1-3-(10).
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.